Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 4.2. Remediated Property Fresh Start Program.

§ 10.1-1429.4.
Repealed by Acts 2002, c. 378, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2002.

Cross references.

For the Brownfield Restoration and Land Renewal Act, see now §

10.1-1230

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Former §

10.1-1429.4

, pertaining to limitation on liability at remediated properties under the jurisdiction of the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act, as amended, was derived from Acts 1996, c. 554.